California statutes. Insurance Code
(A) The insurance institution or agent shall not be required to furnish specific items of privileged information if it has a reasonable suspicion, based upon specific information available for review by the commissioner, that the applicant, policyholder or individual proposed for coverage has engaged in criminal activity, fraud, material misrepresentation or material nondisclosure.

(B) Specific items of medical record information supplied by a medical care institution or medical professional shall be disclosed either directly to the individual about whom the information relates or to a medical professional designated by the individual and licensed to provide medical care with respect to the condition to which the information relates, whichever the individual prefers.

Mental health record information shall be supplied directly to the individual, pursuant to this subdivision, only with the approval of the qualified professional person with treatment responsibility for the condition to which the information relates.

(3) The names and addresses of the institutional sources that supplied the specific items of information given pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b); provided, however, that the identity of any medical professional or medical care institution shall be disclosed either directly to the individual or to the designated medical professional, whichever the individual prefers.

(c) The obligations imposed by this section upon an insurance institution or agent may be satisfied by another insurance institution or agent authorized to act on its behalf.

(d) When an adverse underwriting decision results solely from an oral request or inquiry, the explanation of reasons and summary of rights required by subdivision (a) or (e) may be given orally to the extent that such information is available.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (d), with respect to a declination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of a property insurance policy covered by Section 675 or an automobile insurance policy covered by Section 660, or an individual life, health, or disability insurance policy, the insurance institution or agent responsible for the decision shall provide the specific reason or reasons in writing at the time of the decision. The communication of medical record information for a life or health insurance policy shall be subject to the disclosure requirements of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). This subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2006.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 436, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

791.11.

No insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization may seek information in connection with an insurance transaction concerning:

(a) Any previous adverse underwriting decision experienced by an individual, or

(b) Any previous insurance coverage obtained by an individual through a residual market mechanism, unless such inquiry also requests the reasons for any previous adverse underwriting decision or the reasons why insurance coverage was previously obtained through a residual market mechanism.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1214, Sec. 1.   Section applicable October 1, 1981, pursuant to Section 791.01.)
-------------------------------------------

791.12.

No insurance institution or agent may base an adverse underwriting decision in whole or in part on the following:

(a) On the fact of a previous adverse underwriting decision or on the fact that an individual previously obtained insurance coverage through a residual market mechanism; provided, however, an insurance institution or agent may base an adverse underwriting decision on further information obtained from an insurance institution or agent responsible for a previous adverse underwriting decision. The further information, when requested, shall create a conclusive presumption that the information is necessary to perform the requesting insurer’s function in connection with an insurance transaction
 involving the individual and, when reasonably available, shall be furnished the requesting insurer and the individual, if applicable.

(b) On personal information received from an insurance-support organization whose primary source of information is insurance institutions; provided, however, an insurance institution or agent may base an adverse underwriting decision on further personal information obtained as the result of information received from an insurance-support organization.

(c) On the fact that an individual has previously inquired and received information about the scope or nature of coverage under a residential fire or property insurance policy, if the information is received from an insurance-support organization whose primary source of information is insurance institutions and the inquiry did not result in the filing of a claim.

(d) On the fact that an accident involving a peace officer, member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, or firefighter has been reported and the insurer retains no liability pursuant to Section 488.5 and subdivision (b) of Section 557.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 823, Sec. 3.   (AB 2298)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

791.13.

An insurance institution, agent, or insurance-support organization shall not disclose any personal or privileged information about an individual collected or received in connection with an insurance transaction unless the disclosure is:

(a) With the written authorization of the individual, and meets either of the conditions specified in paragraph (1) or (2):

(1) If the authorization is submitted by another insurance institution, agent, or insurance-support organization, the authorization meets the requirement of Section 791.06.

(2) If the authorization is submitted by a person other
 than an
 insurance institution, agent, or insurance-support organization, the
 authorization is:

(A) Dated.

(B) Signed by the individual.

(C) Obtained one year or less prior to the date a disclosure is sought pursuant to this section.

(b) To a person other than an insurance institution, agent, or insurance-support organization, provided the disclosure is reasonably necessary:

(1) To enable the person to perform a business, professional, or insurance function for the disclosing insurance institution, agent, or insurance-support organization or insured and the person agrees not to disclose the information further without the individual’s written authorization
 unless the further disclosure:

(A) Would otherwise be permitted by this section if made by an insurance institution, agent, or insurance-support organization; or

(B) Is reasonably necessary for the person to perform its function for the disclosing insurance institution, agent, or insurance-support organization.

(2) To enable the person to provide information to the disclosing insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization for the purpose of:

(A) Determining an individual’s eligibility for an insurance benefit or payment; or

(B) Detecting or preventing criminal activity, fraud,
 material misrepresentation or material nondisclosure in connection with an insurance transaction.

(c) To an insurance institution, agent, insurance-support organization or self-insurer, provided the information disclosed is limited to that which is reasonably necessary under either paragraph (1) or (2):

(1) To detect or prevent criminal activity, fraud, material misrepresentation, or material nondisclosure in connection with insurance transactions; or

(2) For either the disclosing or receiving insurance institution, agent, or insurance-support organization to perform its function in connection with an insurance transaction involving the individual.

(d) To a medical-care institution or medical professional for the purpose of any of the following:

(1) Verifying insurance coverage or benefits.

(2) Informing an individual of a medical problem of which the individual may not be aware.

(3) Conducting operations or services audit, provided the only information disclosed is reasonably necessary to accomplish the foregoing purposes.

(e) To an insurance regulatory authority; or

(f) To a law enforcement or other governmental authority pursuant to law.

(g) Otherwise permitted or
 required by law.

(h) In response to a facially valid administrative or judicial order, including a search warrant or subpoena.

(i) Made for the purpose of conducting actuarial or research studies, provided:

(1) No individual may be identified in any actuarial or research
 report.

(2) Materials allowing the individual to be identified are returned or destroyed as soon as they are no longer needed.

(3) The actuarial or research organization agrees not to disclose the information unless the disclosure would otherwise be permitted by this section if made by an insurance institution, agent, or insurance-support organization.

(j) To a party or a representative of a party to a proposed or consummated sale, transfer, merger, or consolidation of all or part of the business of the insurance institution, agent, or insurance-support organization, provided:

(1) Prior to the consummation of the sale, transfer, merger, or consolidation
 the only information disclosed is reasonably necessary to enable the recipient to make business decisions about the purchase, transfer, merger, or consolidation.

(2) The recipient agrees not to disclose the information unless the disclosure would otherwise be permitted by this section if made by an insurance institution, agent, or insurance-support organization.

(k) To a person whose only use of the information will be in connection with the marketing of a product or service, provided:

(1) No medical-record information, privileged information, or personal information relating to an individual’s character, personal habits, mode of living, or general reputation is disclosed, and no classification derived from the
 information is disclosed; or

(2) The individual has been given an opportunity to indicate that the individual does not want personal information disclosed for marketing purposes and has given no indication that the individual does not want the information disclosed; and

(3) The person receiving the information agrees not to use it except in connection with the marketing of a product or service.

(l) To an affiliate whose only use of the information will be in connection with an audit of the insurance institution or agent or the marketing of an insurance product or service, provided the affiliate agrees not to disclose the information for any other purpose or to unaffiliated persons.

(m) By a consumer reporting agency, provided the disclosure is to a person other than an insurance institution or agent.

(n) To a group policyholder for the purpose of reporting claims experience or conducting an audit of the insurance institution’s or agent’s operations or services, provided the information disclosed is reasonably necessary for the group policyholder to conduct the review or audit.

(o) To a professional peer review organization for the purpose of reviewing the service or conduct of a medical-care institution or medical professional.

(p) To a governmental authority for the purpose of determining the individual’s eligibility for health benefits for which the governmental authority may be
 liable.

(q) To a certificate holder or policyholder for the purpose of providing information regarding the status of an insurance transaction.

(r) To a lienholder, mortgagee, assignee, lessor, or other person shown on the records of an insurance institution or agent as having a legal or beneficial interest in a policy of insurance. The information disclosed shall be limited to that which is reasonably necessary to permit the person to protect that person’s interest in the policy and shall be consistent with Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 770).

(s) To an insured or the insured’s lawyer when the information disclosed is from an accident report, supplemental report, investigative report, or the actual
 report from a government agency or is a copy of an accident report or other report that the insured is entitled to obtain under Section 20012 of the Vehicle Code or Article 1 (commencing with Section 7923.600) of Chapter 1 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 297.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

791.14.

(a) The commissioner shall have power to examine and investigate into the affairs of every insurance institution or agent doing business in this state to determine whether the insurance institution or agent has been or is engaged in any conduct in violation of this article.

(b) The commissioner shall have the power to examine and investigate into the affairs of every insurance-support organization acting on behalf of an insurance institution or agent which either transacts business in this state or transacts business outside this state that has an effect on a person residing in this state in order to determine whether such insurance-support organization has been or is engaged in any conduct in violation of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1214, Sec. 1.   Section applicable October 1, 1981, pursuant to Section 791.01.)
-------------------------------------------

791.15.

(a) Whenever the commissioner has reason to believe that an insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization has been or is engaged in conduct in this state which violates this article, or if the commissioner believes that an insurance-support organization has been or is engaged in conduct outside this state which has an effect on a person residing in this state and which violates this article, the commissioner shall issue and serve upon such insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization a statement of charges and notice of hearing to be held at a time and place fixed in the notice. The date for such hearing shall be not less than 30 days after the date of service.

(b) At the time and place fixed for such hearing the insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization charged shall have an opportunity to answer the charges against it and present evidence on its behalf. Upon good cause shown, the commissioner shall permit any adversely affected person to intervene, appear and be heard at such hearing by counsel or in person.

(c) At any hearing conducted pursuant to this section the commissioner may administer oaths, examine and cross-examine witnesses and receive oral and documentary evidence. The commissioner shall have the power to subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance and require the production of books, papers, records, correspondence and other documents which are relevant to the hearing. A stenographic record of the hearing shall be made upon the request of any party or at the discretion of the commissioner. If no stenographic record is made and if judicial review is sought, the commissioner shall prepare a statement of the evidence for use on review. Hearings conducted under this section shall be governed by the same rules of evidence and procedure applicable to administrative proceedings conducted under the laws of this state.

(d) Statements of charges, notice, orders and other processes of the commissioner under this article may be served by anyone duly authorized to act on behalf of the commissioner. Service of process may be completed in the manner provided by law for service of process in civil actions or by registered mail or by a mailing service offered by a third party mailing service with tracking capability that is not more expensive than registered mail. A copy of the statement of charges, notice, order or other process shall be provided to the person or persons whose rights under this article have been allegedly violated. A verified return setting forth the manner of service, the return postcard receipt in the case of registered mail, or signed receipt documentation, shall be sufficient proof of service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 145, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

791.16.

For the purpose of this article, an insurance-support organization transacting business outside this state that has an effect on a person residing in this state shall be deemed to have appointed the commissioner to accept service of process on its behalf, provided the commissioner causes a copy of the service to be mailed immediately by registered mail, or by a mailing service offered by a third party mailing service with tracking capability that is not more expensive than registered mail, to the insurance-support organization at its last known principal place of business. The return postcard receipt or signed receipt documentation for the mailing shall be sufficient proof that the same was properly mailed by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 145, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

791.17.

(a) If, after a hearing pursuant to Section 791.15, the commissioner determines that the insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization charged has engaged in conduct or practices in violation of this article, the commissioner shall reduce his or her findings to writing and shall issue and cause to be served upon such insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization a copy of such findings and an order requiring such insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization to cease and desist from the conduct or practices constituting a violation of this article.

(b) If, after a hearing pursuant to Section 791.15, the commissioner determines that the insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization charged has not engaged in conduct or practices in violation of this article, the commissioner shall prepare a written report which sets forth findings of fact and conclusions of law. Such report shall be served upon the insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization charged and upon the person or persons, if any, whose rights under this article were allegedly violated.

(c) Until the expiration of the time allowed under Section 791.18 for filing a petition for review or until such petition is actually filed, whichever occurs first, the commissioner may modify or set aside any order or report issued under this section. After the expiration of the time allowed under Section 791.18 for filing a petition for review, if no such petition has been duly filed, the commissioner may, after notice and opportunity for hearing, alter, modify or set aside, in whole or in part, any order or report issued under this section whenever conditions of fact or law warrant such action or if the public interest so requires.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 106, Sec. 15.   Effective June 29, 1981.   Amending action operative June 30, 1981, pursuant to Stats. 1981, Ch. 121, Sec. 3.   Section applicable October 1, 1981, pursuant to Section 791.01.)
-------------------------------------------

791.18.

(a) Any person subject to an order of the commissioner under Section 779.17 or Section 791.20 or any person whose rights under this article were allegedly violated may obtain a review of any order or report of the commissioner by filing in a court of competent jurisdiction, within 30 days from the date of the service of such order or report, pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The court shall have jurisdiction to make and enter a decree modifying, affirming or reversing any order or report of the commissioner, in whole or in part.

(b) An order or report issued by the commissioner under Section 791.17 shall become final:

(1) Upon the expiration of the time allowed for the filing of a petition for review, if no such petition has been duly filed; except that the commissioner may modify or set aside an order or report to the extent provided in subdivision (c) of Section 791.17; or

(2) Upon a final decision of the court if the court directs that the order or report of the commissioner be affirmed or the petition for review dismissed.

(c) No order or report of the commissioner under this article or order of a court to enforce the same shall in any way relieve or absolve any person affected by such order or report from any liability under any law of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1214, Sec. 1.   Section applicable October 1, 1981, pursuant to Section 791.01.)
-------------------------------------------

791.19.

Any person who violates a cease and desist order of the commissioner under Section 791.17 may, after notice and hearing and upon order of the commissioner, be subject to one or more of the following penalties, at the discretion of the commissioner:

(a) A monetary fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation; or

(b) A monetary fine of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) if the commissioner finds that violations have occurred with such frequency as to constitute a general business practice; or

(c) Suspension or revocation of an insurance institution’s or agent’s license if the insurance institution or agent knew or reasonably should have known it was in violation of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1214, Sec. 1.   Section applicable October 1, 1981, pursuant to Section 791.01.)
-------------------------------------------

791.20.

(a) If any insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization fails to comply with Section 791.08, 791.09 or 791.10 with respect to the rights granted under those sections, any person whose rights are violated may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction, for appropriate equitable relief.

(b) An insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization which discloses information in violation of Section 791.13 shall be liable for damages sustained by the individual about whom the information relates. However no individual shall be entitled to a monetary award which exceeds the actual damages sustained by the individual as a result of a violation of Section 791.13.

(c) In any action brought pursuant to this section, the court may award the cost of the action and reasonable attorney’s fees to the prevailing party.

(d) An action under this section shall be brought within two years from the date the alleged violation is or should have been discovered.

(e) Except as specifically provided in this section, there shall be no remedy or recovery available to individuals, in law or in equity, for occurrences constituting a violation of any provision of this act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 106, Sec. 16.   Effective June 29, 1981.   Amending action operative June 30, 1981, pursuant to Stats. 1981, Ch. 121, Sec. 3.   Section applicable October 1, 1981, pursuant to Section 791.01.)
-------------------------------------------

791.21.

No cause of action in the nature of defamation, invasion of privacy or negligence shall arise against any person for disclosing personal or privileged information in accordance with this chapter, nor shall such a cause of action arise against any person for furnishing personal or privileged information to an insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization; provided, however, this section shall provide no immunity for disclosing or furnishing false information with malice or willful intent to injure any person.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 106, Sec. 18.   Effective June 29, 1981.   Repealing and adding actions operative June 30, 1981, pursuant to Stats. 1981, Ch. 121, Sec. 3.   Section applicable October 1, 1981, pursuant to Section 791.01.)
-------------------------------------------

791.22.

Any person who knowingly and willfully obtains information about an individual from an insurance institution, agent or insurance-support organization under false pretenses shall be fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or imprisoned for not more than one year, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1214, Sec. 1.   Section applicable October 1, 1981, pursuant to Section 791.01.)
-------------------------------------------

791.23.

The rights granted under Sections 791.08, 791.09 and 791.13 shall take effect on October 1, 1981, regardless of the date of the collection or receipt of the information which is the subject of such sections. Nothing contained in subdivisions (k) and (l) of Section 791.13, or in any other provision of this article, shall in any way affect the provisions of Section 770.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 106, Sec. 19.   Effective June 29, 1981.   Amending action operative June 30, 1981, pursuant to Stats. 1981, Ch. 121, Sec. 3.   Section applicable October 1, 1981, pursuant to Section 791.01.)
-------------------------------------------

791.26.

Where an authorization from the individual was granted to a nonprofit hospital service plan prior to October 1, 1981, such authorization shall be deemed to be in compliance with this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 106, Sec. 20.   Effective June 29, 1981.   Amending action operative June 30, 1981, pursuant to Stats. 1981, Ch. 121, Sec. 3.   Section applicable October 1, 1981, pursuant to Section 791.01.)
-------------------------------------------

791.27.

(a) A disability insurer that provides coverage for hospital, medical, or surgical expenses shall not release any information to an employer that would directly or indirectly indicate to the employer that an employee is receiving or has received services from a health care provider covered by the plan unless authorized to do so by the employee. An insurer that has, pursuant to an agreement, assumed the responsibility to pay compensation pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 3750) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Labor Code, shall not be considered an employer for the purposes of this section.

(b) Nothing in this section prohibits a disability insurer from
 releasing relevant information described in this section for the purposes set forth in Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1871) of Part 2 of Division 1.

(c) Nothing in this section prohibits a disability insurer from releasing relevant information described in this section for the purposes set forth in Section 10181.10.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 577, Sec. 4.   (SB 1182)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

791.28.

(a) An insurer under a personal lines residential property insurance policy, if it reports the claims history or loss experience of insureds under those policies to an insurance-support organization, shall provide the insured with the following additional disclosure at the time that it provides the disclosure required pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 790.034:

“This insurer reports claim information to one or more claims information databases. The claim information is used to furnish loss history reports to insurers. If you are interested in obtaining a report from a claims information database, you may do so by contacting:

(Insert the name, toll-free telephone number, and, if applicable, Internet Web site address of each claims information database to which the insurer reports the information covered by this section)”

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2006.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 433, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Section operative July 1, 2006, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

791.29.

Notwithstanding any other law, and to the extent permitted by federal law, a health insurer shall take the following steps to protect the confidentiality of an insured’s medical information:

(a) (1) A health insurer shall not require a protected individual to obtain the policyholder’s authorization to receive sensitive services or to submit a claim for sensitive services if the protected individual has the right to consent to care.

(2) A health insurer shall recognize the right of a protected individual to exclusively exercise rights granted under this section regarding medical information related to sensitive services
 that the protected individual has received.

(3) A health insurer shall direct all communications regarding a protected individual’s receipt of sensitive health care services directly to the protected individual receiving care as follows:

(A) If the protected individual has designated an alternative mailing address, email address, or telephone number pursuant to subdivision (b), the health insurer shall send or make all communications related to the protected individual’s receipt of sensitive services to the alternative mailing address, email address, or telephone number designated.

(B) If the protected individual has not designated an alternative mailing address, email address, or telephone number pursuant to subdivision
 (b), the health insurer shall send or make all communications related to the protected individual’s receipt of sensitive services in the name of the protected individual at the address or telephone number on file.

(C) Communications subject to this paragraph shall include the following written, verbal, or electronic communications:

(i) Bills and attempts to collect payment.

(ii) A notice of adverse benefits determinations.

(iii) An explanation of benefits notice.

(iv) A health insurer’s request for additional information regarding a claim.

(v) A notice of a contested claim.

(vi) The name and address of a provider, description of services provided, and other information related to a visit.

(vii) Any written, oral, or electronic communication from a health insurer that contains protected health information.

(4) A health insurer shall not disclose medical information related to sensitive health care services provided to a protected individual to the policyholder or any insureds other than the protected individual receiving care, absent an express written authorization of the protected individual receiving care.

(b) (1) A health insurer shall permit an insured to request, and shall
 accommodate requests for, confidential communication in the form and format requested by the insured, if it is readily producible in the requested form and format, or at alternative locations.

(2) A health insurer may require the insured to make a request for a confidential communication described in paragraph (1) in writing or by electronic transmission.

(3) The confidential communication request shall apply to all communications that disclose medical information or provider name and address related to receipt of medical services by the individual requesting the confidential communication.

(4) The confidential communication request shall be valid until the insured submits a revocation of the request, or a new confidential
 communication request is submitted.

(5) For the purposes of this section, a confidential communications request shall be implemented by the health insurer within 7 calendar days of the receipt of an electronic transmission, telephonic request, or request submitted through the health insurer’s internet website, or within 14 calendar days of receipt by first-class mail. The health insurer shall acknowledge receipt of the confidential communications request and advise the insured of the status of implementation of the request if an insured contacts the insurer.

(c) (1) A health insurer shall notify insureds that they may request a confidential communication pursuant to subdivision (b) and how to make the request.

(2) The information required to be provided pursuant to this subdivision shall be provided to insureds with individual or group coverage upon initial enrollment and annually thereafter upon renewal. The information shall also be provided in the following manner:

(A) In a conspicuously visible location in the evidence of coverage.

(B) On the health insurer’s internet website, accessible through a hyperlink on the internet website’s home page and in a manner that allows insureds, prospective insureds, and members of the public to easily locate the information.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a provider of health care may make arrangements with the insured for the payment of benefit cost sharing and
 communicate that arrangement with the insurer.

(e) A health insurer shall not condition coverage on the waiver of rights provided in this section.

(f) If the commissioner determines that an insurer has violated this section, the commissioner may, after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), by order, assess a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation, or, if a violation was willful, a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation. The commissioner shall have the discretion to determine the acts or omissions that constitute a violation of this section.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2022.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 190, Sec. 7) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 628, Sec. 7.   (AB 2091)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.7. Joint Activities [795. - 795.7.]

795.

It is the purpose of this article to provide a means of more adequately meeting the needs of persons who are 65 years of age or older and their spouses for insurance coverage against financial loss from accident or disease through the combined resources and experience of a number of insurers; to make possible the fullest extension of such coverage by encouraging insurers to combine their resources and experience and to exercise their collective efforts in the development and offering of policies of such insurance to all such applicants at costs lower than those generally available through individual insurers; and to regulate the joint activities herein authorized in accordance with the intent of Congress as expressed in the Act of Congress of March 9, 1945 (Public Law 15, 79th Congress), as amended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2055.)
-------------------------------------------

795.1.

Wherever used in this article, the following terms shall have the meanings hereinafter set forth or indicated, unless the context otherwise requires:

(a) “Association” means a voluntary unincorporated association formed for the purpose of enabling co-operative action to provide disability insurance in accordance with this article in this or any other state having legislation enabling the issuance of insurance of the type provided in this article.

(b) “Insurer” means any insurance company which is authorized to transact disability insurance in this State.

(c) “Extended health insurance” means hospital, surgical and medical expense insurance provided by a policy issued as provided by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2055.)
-------------------------------------------

795.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code or any other law which may be inconsistent herewith, any insurer may join with one or more other insurers to plan, develop, underwrite, and offer and provide to any person who is 65 years of age or older and to the spouse of such person, extended health insurance against financial loss from accident or disease, or both. Such insurance may be offered, issued and administered jointly by two or more insurers by a group policy issued to a policyholder through an association formed for the purpose of offering, selling, issuing and administering such insurance. The policyholder may be an association, a trustee, or any other person. Any such policy may provide, among other things, that the benefits payable thereunder are subject to reduction if the individual insured has any other coverage providing hospital, surgical or medical benefits whether on an indemnity basis or a provision of service basis resulting in such insured being eligible for more than 100 percent of covered expenses which he is required to pay, and any insurer issuing individual policies providing extended hospital, surgical or medical benefits to persons 65 years of age and older and their spouses may also use such a policy provision. A master group policy issued to an association or to a trustee or any person appointed by an association for the purpose of providing the insurances described in this article shall be another form of group disability insurance.

Any form of policy approved by the commissioner for an association shall be offered throughout California to all persons 65 and older and their spouses, and the coverage of any person insured under such a form of policy shall not be cancelable except for nonpayment of premiums unless the coverage of all persons insured under such form of policy is also canceled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2055.)
-------------------------------------------

795.25.

Any association, organized in accordance with this article, may offer, issue and administer a policy, or policies, designed to specifically meet the requirements of any federal or state program for provision of health care to segments of the population over 65 years of age. In any case where such a federal or state program is designed to also meet the health care needs of segments of the population under age 65, including, but without limitation, the health care needs of families with dependent children, the blind, the disabled, and the otherwise medically indigent, insurance under such policy or policies may be made available to beneficiaries of such program under age 65. Such an association may also perform administrative services in connection with any such program under contract with the federal government, the state, any agency of either, or any other entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2046.)
-------------------------------------------

795.3.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 755.5 of this code, any person licensed to transact disability insurance as an insurance agent, insurance broker, insurance solicitor or life agent may transact extended health insurance and may be paid a commission thereon in accordance with commission schedules filed with the commissioner as required by Section 795.5 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2055.)
-------------------------------------------

795.4.

Any association formed for the purposes of this article may hold title to property, may enter into contracts, and may limit the liability of its members to their respective pro rata shares of the liability of such association. Any such association may sue and be sued in its associate name and for such purpose only shall be treated as a domestic corporation. Service of process against such association, made upon a managing agent, any member thereof or any agent authorized by appointment to receive service of process, shall have the same force and effect as if such service had been made upon all members of the association. Such association’s books and records shall also be subject to examination under the provisions of Sections 730–738, inclusive, either separately or concurrently with examination of any of its member insurers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2055.)
-------------------------------------------

795.5.
